Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.500

Managers—Rules—Goals.

(1) Except as provided in RCW 41.06.070 and subject to RCW 41.04.820, notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the director is authorized to adopt, after consultation with state agencies and employee organizations, rules for managers as defined in RCW 41.06.022. These rules shall not apply to managers employed by institutions of higher education or related boards or whose positions are exempt. The rules shall govern recruitment, appointment, classification and allocation of positions, examination, training and career development, hours of work, probation, certification, compensation, transfer, affirmative action, promotion, layoff, reemployment, performance appraisals, discipline, and any and all other personnel practices for managers. These rules shall be separate from rules adopted for other employees, and to the extent that the rules adopted under this section apply only to managers shall take precedence over rules adopted for other employees, and are not subject to review by the board.

(2) In establishing rules for managers, the director shall adhere to the following goals:

(a) Development of a simplified classification system that facilitates movement of managers between agencies and promotes upward mobility;

(b) Creation of a compensation system that provides flexibility in setting and changing salaries, and shall require review and approval by the director in the case of any salary changes greater than five percent proposed for any group of employees;

(c) Establishment of a performance appraisal system that emphasizes individual accountability for program results and efficient management of resources; effective planning, organization, and communication skills; valuing and managing workplace diversity; development of leadership and interpersonal abilities; and employee development;

(d) Strengthening management training and career development programs that build critical management knowledge, skills, and abilities; focusing on managing and valuing workplace diversity; empowering employees by enabling them to share in workplace decision making and to be innovative, willing to take risks, and able to accept and deal with change; promoting a workplace where the overall focus is on the recipient of the government services and how these services can be improved; and enhancing mobility and career advancement opportunities;

(e) Permitting flexible recruitment and hiring procedures that enable agencies to compete effectively with other employers, both public and private, for managers with appropriate skills and training; allowing consideration of all qualified candidates for positions as managers; and achieving affirmative action goals and diversity in the workplace;

(f) Providing that managers may only be reduced, dismissed, suspended, or demoted for cause; and

(g) Facilitating decentralized and regional administration.

(3) From February 18, 2009, through June 30, 2013, a salary or wage increase shall not be granted to any position under this section, except that increases may be granted for positions for which the employer has demonstrated difficulty retaining qualified employees if the following conditions are met:

(a) The salary increase can be paid within existing resources;

(b) The salary increase will not adversely impact the provision of client services; and

(c) For any state agency of the executive branch, not including institutions of higher education, the salary increase is approved by the director of the office of financial management.

Any agency granting a salary increase from February 15, 2010, through June 30, 2011, to a position under this section shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than July 31, 2011, detailing the positions for which salary increases were granted, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the increases.

Any agency granting a salary increase from July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2013, to a position under this section shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by July 31, 2012, and July 31, 2013, detailing the positions for which salary increases were granted during the preceding fiscal year, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the increases.

(4) From February 15, 2010, until June 30, 2013, no monetary performance-based awards or growth and development progression adjustments may be granted by the director or employers to the Washington management service employees covered by the rules adopted under this section. This subsection does not prohibit the payment of awards provided for in chapter 41.60 RCW.

From July 1, 2011, until June 30, 2013, no performance-based awards or incentives may be granted by the director or employers to employees pursuant to a performance management confirmation granted by the department of personnel under WAC 357-37-055.

From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, salaries for all positions under this section are subject to RCW 41.04.820.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 39 s 6. Prior: 2010 c 2 s 4; 2010 c 1 s 3; 2009 c 5 s 3; 2002 c 354 s 243; 2002 c 354 s 242; 1996 c 319 s 4; 1993 c 281 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 39: See note following RCW 41.04.820.

Findings—Effective date—2010 c 2: See notes following RCW 41.06.070.

Effective date—2010 c 1: See note following RCW 41.06.070.

Effective date—2009 c 5: See note following RCW 41.06.070.

Short title—Headings, captions not law—Severability—Effective dates—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907 through 41.80.910.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.